Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.175

Transfer of service credit from firefighters' pension system to city's police pension system.

A former employee of a fire department of a city of the first class who (1) was a member of the firefighters' pension system created by chapters 41.16 or 41.18 RCW, and (2) is now employed within the police department of such city, will be regarded as having received membership service credit for such service to the fire department in the city's police and relief pension system at the time he or she recovers such service credit by paying withdrawn contributions to the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system pursuant to *RCW 41.26.030(28).

[ 2012 c 117 s 36; 1974 ex.s. c 148 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.26.030 was amended by 2018 c 230 s 1, changing subsection (28) to subsection (29).